Rhode Island, session 2025, SB208.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
RESOLVED, That a majority of all members elected to each house of the general assembly
voting therefor, the following amendment to the Constitution of the state be proposed to the
qualified electors of the state in accordance with the provisions of Article XIV of the Constitution,
for their approval, and that Section 9 shall be added to Article III, which is hereby amended,
effective January l, 2027, to read as follows:
ARTICLE III
OF QUALIFICATION FOR OFFICE
SECTION 9. Residency and registration for general officers.
No person shall hold office as governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, or general treasurer, unless that person has been a resident and a registered voter in the
State of Rhode Island for at least two (2) years, continuously, prior to taking office.
RESOLVED, That this amendment shall be, in the Constitution of the State, added to
Article III of the Constitution;
It is further
RESOLVED, That said proposition of amendment shall be submitted to the electors for
their approval or rejection at the next statewide general election. The voting places in the several
cities and towns shall be kept open during the hours required by law for voting therein for general
officers of the state; and be it further

RESOLVED, That the secretary of state shall cause the said proposition of amendments to
be published as a part of this resolution in the newspapers of the state prior to the date of the said
meetings of the said electors; and the said proposition shall be inserted in the warrants or notices to
be issued previous to said meetings of the electors for the purpose of warning the town, ward, or
district meetings, and said proposition shall be read by the town, ward, or district meetings to be
held as aforesaid; and be it further
RESOLVED, That the town, ward, and district meetings to be held aforesaid shall be
warned, and the list of voters shall be canvassed and made up, and the said town, ward, and district
meetings shall be conducted in the same manner as now provided by law for the town, ward, and
district meetings for the election of general officers of the state.
========
LC000939
========
LC000939 - Page 2 of 3